Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 4 County and Municipal Hospital Authorities
31-7-83.
Investment of surplus moneys and moneys received through issuance of revenue certificates.

Pending use for the purpose for which received, each hospital authority created by and under this article is authorized and empowered to invest all moneys or any part thereof received through the issuance and sale of revenue certificates of the authority in any securities which are legal investments or which are provided for in the trust indenture securing such certificates or other legal investments; provided, however, that such investments shall be used at all times while held, or upon sale, for the purposes for which the money was originally received and no other. Contributions or gifts received by any authority shall be invested as provided by the terms of the contribution or gift or in the absence thereof as determined by the authority.

In addition to the authorized investments in subsection (a) of this Code section and in Code Section 36-83-4, hospital authorities that have ceased to own or operate medical facilities for a minimum of seven years, have paid off all bonded indebtedness and outstanding short-term or long-term debt obligations, and hold more than $20 million in funds for charitable health care purposes may invest a maximum of 30 percent of their funds in the following:

Shares of mutual funds registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended; and

Commingled funds and collective investment funds maintained by state chartered banks or trust companies or regulated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States Department of the Treasury, including common and group trusts, and, to the extent the funds are invested in such collective investment funds, the funds shall adopt the terms of the instruments establishing any group trust in accordance with applicable United States Internal Revenue Service Revenue Rulings.

In addition to the authorized investments in subsection (a) of this Code section and in Code Section 36-83-4, hospital authorities that have paid off all bonded indebtedness and outstanding short-term or long-term debt obligations and hold an irrevocable trust wherein the corpus of such trust is $75 million or more, irrespective of the source of the funds held in the corpus, may invest a maximum of 30 percent of their funds in the following:

Shares of mutual funds registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended; and

Commingled funds and collective investment funds maintained by state chartered banks or trust companies or regulated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States Department of the Treasury, including common and group trusts, and, to the extent the funds are invested in such collective investment funds, the funds shall adopt the terms of the instruments establishing any group trust in accordance with applicable United States Internal Revenue Service Revenue Rulings.

In addition to the authorized investments in subsection (a) of this Code section and in Code Section 36-83-4, hospital authorities that hold an irrevocable trust wherein the corpus of such trust is $100 million or more may invest its funds, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of Title 47, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law” for large retirement systems, provided that:

The trust investments held by the hospital authority are managed by one or more independent professional investment managers recognized by the National Association of Securities Dealers and the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and which adhere to the code of ethical standards and conduct of the Association for Investment Management and Research; and

The trust investments are limited to those equities of investment grade quality or better, provided that leverage techniques, option techniques, futures, commodities, private placements, and direct participation plans may not be used when making equity investments.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1138, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1820, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 805, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 3-2/HB 186; Ga. L. 2020, p. 220, § 2/SB 395.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); substituted “shall” for “will” in the proviso of the first sentence of subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsections (c) and (d).

31-7-84.
Payment for authority’s services and facilities; levy of tax by political subdivisions; compliance by authority with county budgetary procedures.

An authority shall have no power to tax, but upon the adoption of the resolution by the governing body or bodies of participating units or subdivisions as provided in this article and the execution of a contract for the use of facilities and services of the authority by political subdivisions or participating units as authorized in Code Section 31-7-85, provision shall be made annually by such participating units or political subdivisions contracting with an authority for the payment for the services and facilities of the authority used by the participating units or subdivisions or the residents thereof out of general funds of the participating units or subdivisions or out of tax revenues realized for the purpose of providing medical care or hospitalization for the indigent sick and others entitled to the use of the services and facilities of the authority.

For the purpose of providing such tax revenues as specified above, there is authorized to be levied an ad valorem tax not exceeding seven mills, exclusive of all other taxes which may be levied by counties or by cities or by towns, from which revenues when realized there shall be appropriated annually sums sufficient to pay for the cost of the use of the services and facilities of authorities by participating subdivisions or the residents thereof pursuant to the provisions and covenants of the contract between such participating units and subdivisions and authorities. In determining the cost of such services and facilities furnished pursuant to such contract, there may be included, but without limiting same, the following:

The cost of acquiring, constructing, altering, repairing, renovating, improving, and equipping projects; and

Principal, interest, and sinking fund and other reserve requirements in connection with the issuance of revenue certificates, bonds, or obligations by authorities to finance, in whole or in part, the cost of projects and the payment of expenses incident thereto; the cost of operating, maintaining, and repairing such projects; and the cost of retiring, refinancing, or refunding any outstanding debt or other obligation of any nature incurred by such authorities.

Whenever the fiscal operations of any county falling within the classification of this chapter are governed by any statutory budget law applicable to the fiscal affairs and budget of such county, the governing authorities of such county shall have full power and authority hereunder to require the hospital authority to conform, in whole or in part, to the same budgetary procedures as are made binding by statute upon the county government itself.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 10; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1812, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 552, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1098, § 1.

31-7-85.
Contracts with political subdivisions.

For the purpose of using such facilities, any city or county is authorized by action of its governing body to enter into contracts with an authority for such periods of time not exceeding 40 years as shall be necessary to provide for the continued maintenance and use of the facilities of an authority. Sums due and payable under such contract shall be determined from year to year during the period of such contract and no sums shall be paid for the services in excess of the amounts necessary to provide for the maintenance and operation of projects of authorities and such sums as shall be necessary to provide adequate and necessary facilities for medical care and hospitalization of the indigent sick, including reasonable reserves necessary for expansion and necessary for the payment of the cost of facilities of the projects, provided that any such contract may obligate a city or county or any combination thereof to pay for such services a fixed and definite minimum sum each year based or calculated upon the anticipated cost of such services including the cost and expense of making the facilities of the authority available for the furnishing and performance of such services. The contracts authorized under this Code section to be entered into between cities or counties or any combination thereof and an authority may provide for the conveyance or lease of any existing hospital facilities or projects to an authority created by any such cities or counties for a nominal consideration only, provided that such conveyance shall contain a clause providing that, upon dissolution of the authority, such hospital facilities or projects shall revert to the city or county conveying the same to the authority and provided, further, that no property so conveyed may be mortgaged or in any way given as security for an indebtedness of the authority; this limitation is not to be construed as limiting the right of the authority to pledge or hypothecate revenues which may be realized by the authority from the operation of any property so conveyed to the authority.

When, in accordance with this article, any county shall activate a hospital authority for such county and such authority shall acquire or construct or shall make preparations to acquire or construct a hospital in the county, any municipality in the county shall be authorized to contract with the hospital authority for the care in such hospital of indigent sick or injured persons who are residents of the municipality either on a per-patient-per-day basis or for a fixed amount of money payable at such time as the contracting parties may agree upon; and any such contract may, at the election of such municipality, be binding upon it for a period of not exceeding 40 years. Such contract and the amount to be received by the hospital authority thereunder may be pledged by the hospital authority as security for the payment of the principal and interest of any bonds or revenue anticipation certificates which it may issue in order to acquire or construct the hospital.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 10; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1813, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 15, § 2.

31-7-86.
Manner of operating property conveyed or leased to authority.

Any property conveyed or leased to an authority by cities or counties shall be operated by the authority to which the same is conveyed, together with other facilities of the authority, in accordance with this article and the resolution of the governing body or bodies or participating units.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 10; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1814, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-87.
Hypothecation or mortgaging of purchased hospital facilities.

Should an authority acquire by purchase existing hospital facilities of political subdivisions and pay the reasonable value therefor, nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the hypothecation or mortgaging of such facilities as security for the repayment of any indebtedness which may be legally incurred by such authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 10; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1815, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-88.
Payment of general obligations.

Obligations of an authority other than certificates shall be payable from general funds of an authority and shall at no time be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of certificates except upon payment of current annual maturities and reserves required to be created under Code Section 31-7-77. The maturity of any such obligations shall not extend for more than 40 years.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 11; Code 1933, § 88-1816, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 424, § 1.

31-7-89.
Procedure for dissolution; disposition of property.

By joint action of the board of trustees of an authority and the governing bodies of participating units, authorities created under and pursuant to the terms of this article may be dissolved, provided that no such dissolution shall in any way impair the rights of third persons or the contracts of the authority with such third persons. Disposition to be made of the property of the authority upon dissolution shall be covered in any resolution adopted by the participating units and the board of trustees of the authority. At no time, however, shall any authority upon dissolution convey any of its property, except as may be otherwise authorized by law, to any private person, association, or corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 13; Code 1933, § 88-1817, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-89.1.
“Control” defined; sale or lease by hospital authority subject to requirements of Article 15 of this chapter.

As used in this Code section, the term “control” means ownership of 50 percent or more of the assets of the entity in question or the ability to influence significantly the operations or decisions of the entity in question.

The sale or lease of assets of a hospital owned or operated by a hospital authority to an individual, business corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint venture, nonprofit corporation, hospital authority, or any other for profit or not for profit entity shall be subject to the notice, hearing, certification, enforcement, and other requirements of Article 15 of this chapter which are applicable to dispositions of nonprofit hospitals to acquiring entities if the disposition of assets constitutes a sale or lease of 50 percent or more of the assets of a hospital having a permit under this chapter or constitutes a sale or lease which, when combined with one or more transfers between the same or related parties occurring within a period of five years, constitutes a sale or lease of 50 percent or more of the assets of a hospital having a permit under this chapter; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to the restructuring of a hospital owned by a hospital authority involving a lease of assets to any not for profit or for profit entity which has a principal place of business located in the same county where the main campus of the hospital in question is located and which is not owned, in whole or in part, or controlled by any other for profit or not for profit entity whose principal place of business is located outside such county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, the sale or lease of assets of a hospital owned or operated by a hospital authority to another hospital authority whose area of operation is a county contiguous to the county in which is located the hospital whose sale or lease is proposed shall not be subject to the requirements of Article 15 of this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, a hospital authority which is located in a county having a population of 50,000 or fewer, according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census, may locate a project outside that hospital authority’s area of operation if such location is in a county which is contiguous to the county of such hospital authority’s area of operation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-89.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 850, § 3.1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “this chapter” was substituted for “Chapter 7 of Title 31” in subsection (b).

31-7-90.
Annual report; budget.

The board of trustees of each authority created under this article shall file with the governing body or bodies of political subdivisions or participating units, on forms prescribed by the department, an annual report of the activities of the authority and shall annually consider and adopt as a part of such report a budget, which budget shall be filed with the annual report. The board of trustees may hold a public hearing on the budget, and representatives of any governing body within the area of operation of the authority or any other person having an interest in such budget shall have the right to be heard with respect to any matter covered by the report of the board of trustees or by the budget.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 14; Code 1933, § 88-1818, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-90.1.
Community benefit report; report disclosing member ownership in entities transacting business with authority.

Each hospital authority created by and under this article shall annually prepare a community benefit report disclosing the cost of indigent and charity care provided by such authority for the preceding year not later than 90 days after the close of the fiscal or calendar year. Such report provided for in this Code section shall include a statement of the cost and type of indigent and charity care provided by the authority, including the number of indigent persons served, categorization of those persons by county of residence, as well as the cost of indigent and charity care provided in dollars. Such community benefit report shall be filed with the clerk of superior court of the county in which the authority’s hospital is located, as well as with the governing body or bodies of such authority’s participating units.

Each hospital authority created by and under this article shall also annually prepare a report indicating any entity in which a member or member’s family has a direct or indirect ownership of assets or stock constituting between 10 percent and 25 percent which transacted business with the authority during the previous year. Such report shall be filed with the clerk of superior court of the county in which the authority’s hospital is located, as well as with the governing body or bodies of such authority’s participating units.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-90.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1404, § 4.

Law reviews.

For article, “Putting the Community Back into the ‘Community Benefit’ Standard,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 375 (2010).

31-7-91.
Required annual audit.

Each hospital authority created by and under this article shall ensure that an annual audit of the financial affairs, books, and records of such authority is conducted at the end of each fiscal year for the preceding year. Each hospital authority shall obtain either a certified public accountant or a firm of certified public accountants to conduct such audit. The auditor so appointed shall perform the audit in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and shall submit a complete and final report and audit to the authority not later than 90 days after the close of the fiscal year. All audits provided for in this Code section shall be certified to and shall include, but in no way be limited to, a full and complete audit containing a balance sheet, profit and loss statement, and statement of receipts and disbursements.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1821, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-92.
Filing of audits.

All final audits provided for in Code Section 31-7-91 shall be reproduced in sufficient number and copies of the audit shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court in the county where any hospital is operated by a hospital authority and in the office of the clerk of the superior court of any county that is a participating unit of the authority. In the event any hospital is operated by a municipal hospital authority, the audit required by this Code section to be filed with the office of the clerk of the superior court shall be filed in the office of city clerk, clerk of council, clerk of the board of aldermen, or clerk of the governing body of the municipality, in lieu of being filed with the clerk of the superior court.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1822, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 489, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

31-7-93.
Failure to provide for audit.

In the event any hospital authority shall fail or refuse to provide for an annual audit and have such audit prepared and filed as set forth in Code Sections 31-7-91 and 31-7-92, any taxpayer of any participating unit of such authority or the governing authority of such unit may petition the superior court of the county wherein the authority operates a hospital to require the authority to have such audit prepared and filed as provided by the above Code sections. The judge of such court shall set a time for the hearing on such petition and after notice to the authority shall hear and determine the petition. If it is determined that the authority has failed to comply with the requirements for the preparation and filing of the audit, the judge shall pass such orders as are necessary to effectuate compliance with such requirements. In the event the authority fails to have an audit prepared and filed as required by court order, the members of the authority shall be subject to contempt proceedings by the court as provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1823, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-94.
Grants to hospital authorities and rural hospital organizations.

The state is authorized to make grants, as funds are available, to hospital authorities and rural hospital organizations for public health purposes, provided that any funds so granted shall be distributed to and among the various public hospital authorities and rural hospital organizations in the state in proportion to the number of hospital beds operated by each such hospital authority or rural hospital organization at the end of the calendar year preceding the grant. Funds shall be distributed to public hospitals and rural hospital organizations operated by consolidated governments in the same manner as to authority hospitals prescribed in this Code section and rural hospital organizations. Grants made by the state pursuant to this Code section shall be administered by the Department of Community Health in accordance with Code Section 31-7-94.1 and such rules, regulations, and procedures as it shall deem necessary for effective administration of such grants.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1824, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 777, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1132, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 411, § 1/SB 14.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 8, 2017, throughout this Code section, inserted “and rural hospital organizations”; inserted “or rural hospital organization” near the end of the first sentence; and inserted “Code Section 31-7-94.1 and” in the middle of the third sentence.

31-7-94.1.
Rural Hospital Organization Assistance Act; legislative findings; certification of rural hospitals for grant eligibility; rules and regulations.

This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the “Rural Hospital Organization Assistance Act of 2017.”

The General Assembly finds that hospital authorities and rural hospital organizations are essential in order to promote public health goals of the state. The General Assembly further finds that many rural hospital organizations are in desperate financial straits. In order to preserve the availability of primary health care services provided by such hospitals to residents of rural counties, the General Assembly has determined that a program of state grants is necessary and recommends funds be made available to such hospitals. These grants will be conditioned upon those hospitals continuing to furnish essential health care services to residents in their areas of operation as well as engaging in the long-range planning and any restructuring which may be required for those hospitals to survive by devising cost-effective and efficient health care systems for meeting local health care needs.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Hospital” means an institution which has a permit as a hospital issued under this chapter.

“Rural county” means a county having a population of less than 50,000 according to the United States decennial census of 2010 or any future such census; provided, however, that for counties which contain a military base or installation, the military personnel and their dependents living in such county shall be excluded from the total population of such county for purposes of this definition.

“Rural hospital organization” means an acute care hospital licensed by the department pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter that:

Provides inpatient hospital services at a facility located in a rural county or is a critical access hospital;

Participates in both Medicaid and medicare and accepts both Medicaid and medicare patients;

Provides health care services to indigent patients;

Has at least 10 percent of its annual net revenue categorized as indigent care, charity care, or bad debt;

Annually files IRS Form 990, Return of Organization Exempt From Income Tax, with the department, or for any hospital not required to file IRS Form 990, the department will provide a form that collects the same information to be submitted to the department on an annual basis;

Is operated by a county or municipal authority pursuant to this article or is designated as a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Is current with all audits and reports required by law.

A rural hospital organization may apply for a grant available under subsection (e) of this Code section if it has been certified by the department as:

A rural hospital organization; and

Having submitted a grant application which includes:

A problem statement indicating the problem the rural hospital organization proposes to solve with the grant funds;

The goals of the proposed solution;

The organizational structure, financial system, and facilities that are essential to the proposed solution;

The projected longevity of the proposed solution after the grant funds are expended;

Evidence of collaboration with other community health care providers in achieving the proposed solution;

Evidence that funds for the proposed solution are not available from another source;

Evidence that the grant funds would assist in returning the rural hospital organization to an economically stable condition or that any plan for closure or realignment of services involves development of innovative alternatives for the discontinued services;

Evidence of a satisfactory record-keeping system to account for grant fund expenditures within the rural hospital organization and the rural county;

A community health survival plan describing how the plan was developed, the goals of the plan, the links with existing health care providers under the plan, the implementation process including quantification of indicators of the hospital’s financial well-being, measurable outcome targets, and the current condition of such hospital; and

Such additional evidence as the department may require to demonstrate the feasibility of the proposed solution for which grant funds are sought.

The department is authorized to make grants to rural hospital organizations certified as meeting the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section. Grants to rural hospitals owned or operated by hospital authorities or rural hospital organizations may be for any of the following purposes:

Infrastructure development, including, without being limited to, health information technology, facility renovation, or equipment acquisition; provided, however, that the amount granted to any qualified hospital may not exceed the expenditure thresholds that would constitute a new institutional health service requiring a certificate of need under Chapter 6 of this title and the grant award may be conditioned upon obtaining local matching funds;

Strategic planning, including, without being limited to, strategies for personnel retention or recruitment, development of an emergency medical network, or the development of a collaborative and integrated health care delivery system with other health care providers, and the grant award may be conditioned upon obtaining local matching funds for items such as telemedicine, billing systems, and medical records. For the purposes of this paragraph, the maximum grant to any grantee shall be $500,000.00;

Nontraditional health care delivery systems, excluding operational funds and purposes for which grants may be made under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection. For the purposes of this paragraph, the maximum grant to any grantee shall be $2.5 million; or

The provision of 24 hour emergency room services open to the general public.

In awarding grants under this Code section, the department may give priority to any otherwise eligible rural hospital organization which meets the definition of a necessary provider as specified in the state’s “Rural Healthcare Plan” of May, 1998.

The maximum grant to any hospital authority or rural hospital organization shall be $4 million per calendar year.

The department shall be authorized to certify rural hospital organizations as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section and shall adopt regulations to implement its powers and duties under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-94.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 411, § 2/SB 14; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 31/SB 365.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 8, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Having” for “Has” at the beginning of paragraph (d)(2).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the Rural Hospital Assistance Act. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

31-7-94.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 469, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 31; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1132, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 152, § 2D/HB 1178; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-8/HB 228 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 411, § 2/SB 14, effective May 8, 2017.

31-7-95.
Funding of medical education provided by hospital authorities and designated teaching hospitals.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Designated teaching hospital” means a teaching hospital operated by other than a hospital authority, which hospital agrees to contract with the state to offer or continue to offer a residency program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME), which program has at least one ACGME accredited residency program, excluding any stand-alone fellowship program, and which hospital operates a 24 hour, seven-day-per-week emergency room open to the public and which hospital files a semiannual statistical report consistent with those filed by other state funded tertiary, neonatal, obstetrical centers with the Department of Community Health.

“Hospital authority” means a hospital authority operating a teaching hospital which offers a residency program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.

“Resident” means a physician receiving medical education and training through a teaching hospital operated by a hospital authority or designated teaching hospital.

The General Assembly finds that the major hospital authorities and designated teaching hospitals in this state provide a valuable service benefiting the entire state by operating teaching hospitals which provide necessary medical education and training for physicians; this service is provided through residency programs offered by these teaching hospitals. By the provision of residency programs operated by state teaching hospitals, the state has recognized its responsibility to fund the cost of training physicians; and it is the purpose of this Code section to recognize that the state has a similar responsibility when the medical education and training are provided by teaching hospitals operated by hospital authorities or by designated teaching hospitals.

For each resident receiving medical education and training through a teaching hospital operated by a hospital authority or designated teaching hospital, the Department of Community Health shall pay no more than $10,000.00 per annum to the hospital authority or designated teaching hospital. Such payments shall be made based upon certifications by the hospital authorities or designated teaching hospitals to the Department of Community Health. The Department of Community Health is authorized to designate the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce to promulgate rules and regulations specifying procedures for making the certifications provided for in this Code section and to establish a procedure for making payments to hospital authorities and designated teaching hospitals as provided in this Code section.

The funds necessary to carry out this Code section shall derive from funds appropriated for such purpose to the Department of Community Health. In the event the funds appropriated by the General Assembly are insufficient to fund the full amount payable to hospital authorities or designated teaching hospitals under subsection (c) of this Code section, the amount otherwise payable thereunder shall be reduced pro rata in accordance with the funds actually appropriated for such purpose. The Department of Community Health shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this Code section. No additional teaching hospitals will be added until such funds have been made available for any additional teaching hospitals.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to amend, modify, supersede, or repeal Chapter 10 of Title 49.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1825, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1040, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 585, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1998, p. 193, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1421, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-29/HB 228; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 2/SB 207; Ga. L. 2022, p. 596, § 1/SB 340.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce” for “Georgia Board for Physician Workforce” in the third sentence of subsection (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME)” for “American Medical Association” and “one ACGME accredited residency program, excluding any stand-alone fellowship program,” for “50 residents”, and substituted “Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education” for “American Medical Association” in paragraph (a)(2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, paragraphs (a)(.1), (a)(1), and (a)(2) were redesignated as paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3); a hyphen was deleted between “state” and “funded” in the present paragraph (a)(1); and “hospital” was substituted for “hospitals” in the last sentence of subsection (c).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, the name of the Joint Advisory Board of Family Practice was changed to the Georgia Board for Physician Workforce in the second sentence sentence of subsection (c).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Residency Capitation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Board for Physician Workforce, Chapter 195-2.

31-7-96.
Construction of article.

This article, being necessary for the welfare of the citizens of the state, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof; and insofar as this article may be inconsistent with any other law, whether by charter of any political subdivision of the state or otherwise, this article shall be controlling.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 16; Code 1933, § 88-1819, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Revenue bonds generally, §

36-82-60

et seq.